Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 355. PENALTIES FOR VIOLATIONS OF TITLE 7, PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

Sec. 355.001. OFFENSES THAT ARE CLASS C PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE MISDEMEANORS. Except as provided by Section 355.002 or 355.003 of this code, a person who violates a provision of Title 7 of this code commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 355.002. OFFENSES THAT ARE CLASS B PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE MISDEMEANORS. A person who violates any of the following provisions of Title 7 of this code commits an offense that is a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor:

Section 131.011; 143.023; 229.021; 237.022; 334.041; or 350.021.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.